District of Columbia statutes.
29-413.07

Limitations on use of membership list.

(a)

Without consent of the board of directors, a membership list or any part thereof shall not be obtained or used by any person and shall not be:

(1)

Used to solicit money or property unless the money or property will be used solely to solicit the votes of the members in an election to be held by the nonprofit corporation;

(2)

Used for any commercial purpose; or

(3)

Sold to or purchased by any person.

(b)

Instead of making a membership list available for inspection and copying under this subpart, a nonprofit corporation may elect to proceed under the procedures set forth in § 29-405.20(f).

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-413.02.